Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1050
Flood control funds; counties entitled to share.

The county in which the land described in section 79-1049 is situated on which lease rentals are paid shall be entitled to receive the lease rentals for the benefit of the public schools and public roads of the county. When the land is situated in more than one county, the distributive share to each county from the lease rentals shall be proportional to such land's area within the county.

Laws 1949, c. 251, § 2, p. 683;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1316;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 696.